Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1249
Occupancy, defined.

Occupancy shall mean the use or possession, or the right to the use or possession, of any space in a hotel if the space is one ordinarily used for accommodations and if the occupant's use, possession, or right to the use or possession is for less than a period of thirty days.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 134, § 7.